Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-248
Poor relief; duty of county board.

In all counties the care of the poor shall be under the charge of the county board as provided by law.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 46, p. 144;

R.S.1913, § 1032;

Laws 1915, c. 20, § 1, p. 80;

C.S.1922, § 934;

C.S.1929, § 26-248;

R.S.1943, § 23-248.

In counties under township organization, support of poor devolves upon townships. Custer Township v. Board of Supervisors of Antelope County, 103 Neb. 128, 170 N.W. 600 (1919).